Maine, session 132, LD431.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4010-F is enacted to read:
§4010-F. Driver's license fees; driver education program
1. Driver's license fee coverage. The Office of Child and Family Services shall
establish a program to pay for, or in the case of paragraph A reimburse, the following fees
and costs incurred by a person who is in the department's custody pursuant to this chapter,
who is engaged in the extended care program established in section 4037-A or who is
engaged in the transition grant program established in section 4010-C:
A. All fees waived by the Secretary of State under Title 29-A, section 1251, subsection
8;
B. The cost of motor vehicle insurance obtained in accordance with Title 29-A, section
1354, subsection 9; and
C. Any additional costs related to obtaining a driver's license under Title 29-A, chapter
11.
The department may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this subsection. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
2. Driver education program. The department shall establish a program to ensure
that a child in the department's custody pursuant to this chapter who is 15 years of age or
older is provided with the opportunity to obtain:
A. Assistance in obtaining a driver's license or learner's permit or enrolling in a driver
education course under Title 29-A, chapter 11;
B. Skills training for safe driving;
C. Supervised driving practice hours, including required hours of driving under a
learner's permit; and
D. Information on how to obtain motor vehicle insurance.
The department may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this subsection. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §951, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Purchase by minors. A dealer shall allow a minor who is 15 years and 6 months
of age or older, meets the requirements of section 1251, subsection 8 and has a valid driver's
license under chapter 11 to contract for the purchase of a motor vehicle.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1251, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Fees waived. The Secretary of State shall waive all fees assessed by the bureau
related to obtaining an initial noncommercial Class C driver's license under this chapter for
a person who:
A. Has not attained 27 years of age and who, pursuant to Title 22, chapter 1071, is or
has been placed in the care of someone other than the person's parents by the
Department of Health and Human Services; or
Page 1 - 132LR0108(01)

B. Is a minor living separately and independently from the minor's parents or a legal
guardian. A minor may prove that the minor meets the requirements of this paragraph
by providing documentation determined satisfactory by the Secretary of State,
including, but not limited to:
(1) A written statement affirming that the minor meets the requirements of this
paragraph, signed by:
(a) A director or designee of a governmental or nonprofit agency that receives
public or private funding to provide services to homeless persons;
(b) A local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth
designated pursuant to 42 United States Code, Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii)
(2019) or a school social worker or school counselor; or
(c) An attorney representing the minor;
(2) A copy of a protection from abuse complaint or a temporary order or final
order of protection against the minor's parent or legal guardian; or
(3) A court order of emancipation of the minor under Title 15, section 3506‑A.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1302, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
C. When the minor has no does not have a parent, guardian or spouse who has attained
the age of 18 years of age, signed by the employer of the minor if that employer is 18
years of age or older; or:
(1) A person who is 19 years of age or older who is the minor's employer, the
minor's grandparent, the minor's sibling, the sibling of the minor's parent or that
sibling's spouse or the minor's foster parent as defined in Title 22, section 4002,
subsection 5-A; or
(2) An employee designated by the Department of Health and Human Services,
Office of Child and Family Services; or
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1302, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Liability. A person who lawfully signs an application for a license of a minor under
subsection 1, paragraph C is not liable by reason of having signed the application for
damages caused by the negligence or willful misconduct of the minor while driving under
the license.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §1304, sub-§1, ¶H, as amended by PL 2013, c. 496, §13, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) The person has completed a minimum of 70 hours of driving, including 10
hours of night driving, while accompanied by a parent, guardian or licensed driver
at least 20 years of age or older. The parent, stepparent or guardian, or a spouse or
employer pursuant to person described in section 1302, subsection 1, paragraphs
paragraph B and or C, must shall certify the person's driving time on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State. A parent, stepparent, guardian, spouse or
employer person described in section 1302, subsection 1, paragraph B or C who
certifies a driving log pursuant to this subsection and was not the licensed driver
accompanying the applicant must shall provide the name and address of the
Page 2 - 132LR0108(01)

413 licensed driver who accompanied the applicant for the majority of the 70 hours of
424 driving. The Secretary of State may complete the certification for an applicant at
435 least 18 years of age and or older who has no does not have a parent, stepparent,
446 guardian, spouse or employer person described in section 1302, subsection 1,
457 paragraph B or C if the applicant provides the name and address of the licensed
468 driver who accompanied the applicant for the majority of the 70 hours of driving.
Sec. 7. 29-A MRSA §1354, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 505, §15 and
affected by §22, is amended to read:
9. Insurance for graduates. Rating bureaus or independent insurers as recognized
by the Superintendent of Insurance may grant an automobile insurance discount for driver
education school graduates. A minor who is 15 years and 6 months of age or older who is
a driver education school graduate and who satisfies the requirements of section 1251,
subsection 8 may contract for an automobile insurance policy as provided in Title 24-A,
section 2407.